de: Tierart der Fleecefaser: Alpaka; Angorakaninchen; Bison; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Kamel; Kaschmir (Ziege); Corriedale; Gotland; Islandschaf; Jakobschaf; Lama; Merinoschaf; Mohair (Ziege); Moschusochse (Qiviut); Romney; Schaf (Wolle); Shetlandschaf; Yak; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Flísové vlákno zvieracieho typu: Alpaka; Angorský králik; Bizón; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Ťava; Kašmír (koza); Corriedale; Gotland; Islandská ovca; Jacob; Lama; Merino ovca; Mohér (koza); Pižmoň (qiviut); Romney; Ovca (vlna); Shetlandská ovca; Jak; Iné
nl: Fleecevezel diersoort: Alpaca; Angorakonijn; Bizon; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Kameel; Kasjmier (geit); Corriedale; Gotland; IJslands schaap; Jacob-schaap; Lama; Merinoschaap; Mohair (geit); Muskusos (qiviut); Romney; Schaap (wol); Shetlandschaap; Jak; Overige
da: Fleecefiber dyretype: Alpaka; Angorakanin; Bison; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Kamel; Cashmere (ged); Corriedale; Gotland; Islandsk får; Jacob-får; Lama; Merinofår; Mohair (ged); Moskusokse (qiviut); Romney; Får (uld); Shetlandsfår; Yak; Andet
it: Tipo di animale da cui proviene la fibra di lana: Alpaca; Coniglio d'Angora; Bisonte; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Cammello; Cashmere (capra); Corriedale; Gotland; Pecora islandese; Jacob; Lama; Pecora merino; Mohair (capra); Bue muschiato (qiviut); Romney; Pecora (lana); Pecora delle Shetland; Yak; Altro
zh-TW: 毛纖維動物來源類型: 羊駝; 安哥拉兔; 野牛; 藍面萊斯特羊 (BFL); 駱駝; 喀什米爾羊毛 (山羊); 柯麗代羊; 哥特蘭羊; 冰島羊; 雅各布羊; 大羊駝; 美麗諾羊; 馬海毛 (山羊); 麝香牛 (Qiviut); 羅姆尼羊; 綿羊 (羊毛); 設德蘭羊; 犛牛; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fibra animal de lã: Alpaca; Coelho angorá; Bisonte; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Camelo; Caxemira (cabra); Corriedale; Gotland; Ovelha islandesa; Jacob; Lhama; Ovelha merino; Mohair (cabra); Boi-almiscarado (qiviut); Romney; Ovelha (lã); Ovelha de Shetland; Iaque; Outro
ja: 羊毛繊維動物の種類: アルパカ; アンゴラウサギ; バイソン; ブルーフェイスレスター (BFL); キャメル; カシミヤ (ヤギ); コリデール; ゴットランド; アイスランドシープ; ジェイコブ; ラマ; メリノシープ; モヘア (ヤギ); ジャコウウシ (キビウト); ロムニー; 羊 (ウール); シェットランドシープ; ヤク; その他
bg-BG: Тип животно, от което е добито полареното влакно.: Алпака; Ангорски заек; Бизон; Синьолика лестърска овца (BFL); Камила; Кашмир (коза); Коридейл; Готландска овца; Исландска овца; Овца на Яков; Лама; Мериносова овца; Мохер (коза); Овцебик (кивиут); Ромни; Овца (вълна); Шетландска овца; Як; Друго
ru: Тип животного для флисового волокна: Альпака; Ангорский кролик; Бизон; Блюфейс лейстер (BFL); Верблюд; Кашмирская коза; Корридель; Готландская овца; Исландская овца; Джейкоб; Лама; Мериносовая овца; Мохер (коза); Овцебык (кивиут); Ромни; Овца (шерсть); Шетландская овца; Як; Другое
vi: Loại động vật của sợi lông cừu: Lạc đà Alpaca; Thỏ Angora; Bò rừng; Cừu Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Lạc đà; Dê Cashmere; Cừu Corriedale; Cừu Gotland; Cừu Iceland; Cừu Jacob; Lạc đà Llama; Cừu Merino; Dê Mohair; Bò xạ hương (qiviut); Cừu Romney; Cừu (len); Cừu Shetland; Bò Yak; Khác
zh-CN: 抓绒纤维动物类型: 羊驼毛; 安哥拉兔毛; 野牛毛; 蓝面雷斯特羊毛 (BFL); 骆驼毛; 羊绒（山羊）; 考力代羊毛; 哥特兰羊毛; 冰岛羊毛; 雅各布羊毛; 大羊驼毛; 美利奴羊毛; 马海毛（山羊）; 麝牛毛 (qiviut); 罗姆尼羊毛; 绵羊毛（羊毛）; 设得兰羊毛; 牦牛毛; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de animal sursă pentru fibra de lână: Alpaca; Iepure de Angora; Bizon; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Cămilă; Cașmir (capră); Corriedale; Gotland; Oaie islandeză; Jacob; Lamă; Oaie merinos; Mohair (capră); Bou moscat (qiviut); Romney; Oaie (lână); Oaie Shetland; Iac; Altele
pl: Typ zwierzęcego włókna runa: Alpaka; Królik angorski; Bizon; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Wielbłąd; Kaszmir (koza); Corriedale; Gotland; Owca islandzka; Jacob; Lama; Owca merynosowa; Moher (koza); Wół piżmowy (qiviut); Romney; Owca (wełna); Owca szetlandzka; Jak; Inne
ko: 플리스 섬유 원료 동물 종류: 알파카; 앙고라 토끼; 바이슨; 블루페이스 레스터(BFL); 낙타; 캐시미어(염소); 코리데일; 고틀란드; 아이슬란드 양; 제이콥; 라마; 메리노 양; 모헤어(염소); 사향소(키비우트); 롬니; 양(양모); 셰틀랜드 양; 야크; 기타
th: ประเภทเส้นใยขนแกะ: อัลปากา; กระต่ายแองโกรา; ไบซัน; บลูเฟสเลสเตอร์ (BFL); อูฐ; แคชเมียร์ (แพะ); คอร์ริเดล; กอตแลนด์; แกะไอซ์แลนด์; เจค็อบ; ลามะ; แกะเมอริโน; โมแฮร์ (แพะ); มัสก์ออกซ์ (กิวิอุต); รอมนีย์; แกะ (ขนแกะ); แกะเชตแลนด์; จามรี; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta živali izvora flisa/vlaken: Alpaka; Angorski kunec; Bizon; Ovca Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Kamela; Kašmirska koza; Ovca Corriedale; Gotlandska ovca; Islandska ovca; Ovca Jacob; Lama; Merino ovca; Angorska koza (moher); Moškatno govedo (qiviut); Ovca Romney; Ovca (volna); Šetlandska ovca; Jak; Drugo
en: Fleece fiber animal type: Alpaca; Angora rabbit; Bison; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Camel; Cashmere (goat); Corriedale; Gotland; Icelandic sheep; Jacob; Llama; Merino sheep; Mohair (goat); Musk ox (qiviut); Romney; Sheep (wool); Shetland sheep; Yak; Other
es: Tipo animal de fibra de vellón: Alpaca; Conejo de Angora; Bisonte; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Camello; Cachemira (cabra); Corriedale; Gotland; Oveja islandesa; Jacob; Llama; Oveja merina; Mohair (cabra); Buey almizclero (qiviut); Romney; Oveja (lana); Oveja de las Shetland; Yak; Otro
lt-LT: Fliso pluošto gyvūno tipas: Alpaka; Angoros triušis; Bizonas; Mėlynveidis Lesteris (BFL); Kupranugaris; Kašmyras (ožka); Koridėlis; Gotlando avis; Islandijos avis; Jokūbo avis; Lama; Merinosų avis; Mohera (ožka); Muskusinis jautis („Qiviut“); Romnio avis; Avis (vilna); Šetlando avis; Jakas; Kita
sv: Djurtyp för fleecefiber: Alpacka; Angorakanin; Bison; Bluefaced leicester (BFL); Kamel; Kashmir (get); Corriedale; Gotlandsfår; Isländskt får; Jacobfår; Lama; Merinofår; Mohair (get); Myskoxe (qiviut); Romney; Får (ull); Shetlandsfår; Jakk; Övrigt
hu: A gyapjúszál állatfajtája: Alpaka; Angóranyúl; Bölény; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Teve; Kasmír (kecske); Corriedale; Gotland; Izlandi juh; Jacob juh; Láma; Merinó juh; Moher (kecske); Pézsmatulok (qiviut); Romney; Juh (gyapjú); Shetlandi juh; Jak; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de animal da fibra de lã: Alpaca; Coelho angorá; Bisão; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Camelo; Caxemira (cabra); Corriedale; Gotland; Ovelha islandesa; Jacob; Lhama; Ovelha merino; Mohair (cabra); Boi-almiscarado (qiviut); Romney; Ovelha (lã); Ovelha de Shetland; Iaque; Outro
fi: Fleecekuidun eläintyyppi: Alpakka; Angorakani; Biisoni; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Kameli; Kasmir (vuohi); Corriedale; Gotlanti; Islanninlammas; Jacobinlammas; Laama; Merinolammas; Mohair (vuohi); Myskihärkä (qiviut); Romneynlammas; Lammas (villa); Shetlandinlammas; Jakki; Muu
hr-HR: Životinjska vrsta flis vlakana: Alpaka; Angorski zec; Bizon; Ovca Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Deva; Kašmir (koza); Corriedale ovca; Gotlandska ovca; Islandska ovca; Jacob ovca; Ljama; Merino ovca; Moher (koza); Mošusno govedo (qiviut); Romney ovca; Ovca (vuna); Šetlandska ovca; Jak; Ostalo
el: Τύπος ζώου προέλευσης της ίνας fleece: Αλπακά; Κουνέλι Ανγκορά; Βίσονας; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Καμήλα; Κασμίρ (κατσίκα); Corriedale; Gotland; Ισλανδικό πρόβατο; Jacob; Λάμα; Πρόβατο μερινό; Μοχέρ (κατσίκα); Μοσχόβους (qiviut); Romney; Πρόβατο (μαλλί); Πρόβατο Shetland; Γιακ; Άλλο
fr: Espèce animale de la fibre de toison: Alpaga; Lapin angora; Bison; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Chameau; Cachemire (chèvre); Corriedale; Gotland; Mouton islandais; Jacob; Lama; Mouton mérinos; Mohair (chèvre); Bœuf musqué (qiviut); Romney; Mouton (laine); Mouton shetland; Yak; Autre
cs: Typ zvířete pro vlákno rouna: Alpaka; Angorský králík; Bizon; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Velbloud; Kašmír (koza); Corriedale; Gotland; Islandská ovce; Jacob; Lama; Ovce merino; Mohér (koza); Pižmoň (qiviut); Romney; Ovce (vlna); Shetlandská ovce; Jak; Ostatní
tr: Yapağı elyafı hayvan türü: Alpaka; Ankara tavşanı; Bizon; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Deve; Kaşmir (keçi); Corriedale; Gotland; İzlanda koyunu; Jacob; Lama; Merinos koyunu; Tiftik (keçi); Misk sığırı (qiviut); Romney; Koyun (yün); Shetland koyunu; Yak; Diğer
nb: Fleecefiber dyretype: Alpakka; Angorakanin; Bison; Bluefaced Leicester (BFL); Kamel; Kasjmir (geit); Corriedale; Gotland; Islandssau; Jacob; Lama; Merinosau; Mohair (geit); Moskusfe (qiviut); Romney; Sau (ull); Shetlandsau; Jak; Annet